sk-SK: Aplikácia taviteľnej švovej pásky: Tvorba kostýmov/cosplayov; Remeselné projekty; Švy na závesoch/záclonách; Oprava odevov; Utesnenie švov outdoorového vybavenia; Úprava strihov / dočasné stehovanie; Zosilnenie švov; Utesnenie švov (vodoodolné); Švy čalúnenia; Iné
hr-HR: Aplikacija ljepljive trake za šavove: Izrada kostima / cosplay; Obrtnički projekti; Šavovi za zavjese/zastori; Popravci odjeće; Brtvljenje šavova opreme za van; Preinaka kroja / privremeno fiksiranje; Pojačanje šavova; Brtvljenje šavova (vodootporno); Šavovi za presvlake; Ostalo
ja: 接着シームテープ適用: コスチューム/コスプレ制作; クラフトプロジェクト; カーテン/ドレープの縫い目; 衣類の修理; アウトドアギアのシームシーリング; パターン変更/仮縫い; シーム補強; シームシーリング (耐水性); 家具製造の縫い目; その他
ko: 접착식 심 테이프 적용 방식: 의상/코스프레 제작; 공예 프로젝트; 커튼/휘장 솔기; 의류 수선; 아웃도어 장비 심실링; 패턴 수정/임시 시침질; 솔기 보강; 심실링(내수성); 실내 장식 솔기; 기타
zh-CN: 可熔接缝胶带应用: 服装/Cosplay 制作; 手工项目; 窗帘/帷幔接缝; 衣物修补; 户外装备接缝密封; 纸样修改/临时疏缝; 接缝加固; 接缝密封（抗水）; 室内装潢接缝; 其他
nl: Smeltbare naadtape toepassing: Maken van kostuums/cosplay; Knutselprojecten; Gordijn-/vitragezomen; Kledingreparaties; Naadafdichting voor outdooruitrusting; Patroonaanpassing/tijdelijk rijgen; Naadversterking; Naadafdichting (waterafstotend); Meubelstofferingsnaden; Anders
hu: Olvadó varratszalag alkalmazása: Jelmez/cosplay készítés; Kézműves projektek; Függöny/sötétítő varrások; Ruházat javítása; Szabadtéri felszerelés varrásainak szigetelése; Szabásminta módosítás/ideiglenes fércelés; Varráserősítés; Varrásszigetelés (vízálló); Kárpitos varrások; Egyéb
es: Aplicación de cinta termoadhesiva para costuras: Creación de disfraces y cosplay; Proyectos de manualidades; Costuras de cortinas; Reparaciones de prendas; Sellado de costuras en equipos para exteriores; Alteración de patrones/hilvanado temporal; Refuerzo de costuras; Sellado de costuras (resistente al agua); Costuras de tapicería; Otro
lt-LT: Lydžios siūlių juostos paskirtis: Kostiumų / „cosplay“ gamyba; Rankdarbių projektai; Užuolaidų / draperijų siūlės; Drabužių taisymas; Lauko aprangos siūlių sandarinimas; Iškarpų keitimas / laikinas daigstymas; Siūlių sutvirtinimas; Siūlių sandarinimas (atsparus vandeniui); Apmušalų siūlės; Kita
da: Påføring af smeltebånd til sømme: Kostume-/cosplayfremstilling; Hobbyprojekter; Sømme i gardiner/forhæng; Tøjreparationer; Forsegling af sømme på udendørsudstyr; Mønstertilpasning/midlertidig rining; Forstærkning af sømme; Sømforsegling (vandafvisende); Sømme i polstring; Andet
pt-BR: Aplicação da fita de costura termocolante: Confecção de fantasia/cosplay; Projetos de artesanato; Bainhas de cortina/cortinado; Reparos em roupas; Vedação de costuras de equipamentos para atividades ao ar livre; Alteração de modelagem/alinhavo temporário; Reforço de costura; Vedação de costuras (resistente à água); Costuras de estofamento; Outro
de: Verwendungszweck von Schmelznahtband: Kostüm-/Cosplay-Anfertigung; Bastelprojekte; Vorhang-/Gardinensäume; Reparatur von Kleidungsstücken; Nahtversiegelung für Outdoor-Ausrüstung; Schnittmusteränderung/vorübergehendes Heften; Nahtverstärkung; Nahtversiegelung (wasserabweisend); Polsternähte; Sonstige
fr: Application du ruban thermocollant pour coutures: Création de costumes/cosplay; Projets d’artisanat; Coutures de rideaux/draperies; Réparations de vêtements; Imperméabilisation des coutures pour équipement de plein air; Retouche de patron/bâti temporaire; Renfort de couture; Scellage de coutures (résistant à l’eau); Coutures de rembourrage; Autre
pt-PT: aplicação de fita adesiva termocolante: Construção de disfarces/cosplay; Projetos de artesanato; Costuras de cortinas; Reparações de roupa; Selagem de costuras de equipamento de exterior; Alteração de molde/alinhavo temporário; Reforço de costura; Selagem de costuras (resistente à água); Costuras de estofos; Outro
ru: Применение плавкой ленты для швов: Создание костюмов/косплея; Поделки; Швы для штор/портьер; Ремонт одежды; Герметизация швов туристического снаряжения; Корректировка выкроек/временная наметка; Усиление швов; Герметизация швов (водостойкая); Швы для обивки мебели; Другое
en: Fusible seam tape application: Costume/ cosplay construction; Craft projects; Curtain/drapery seams; Garment repairs; Outdoor gear seam sealing; Pattern alteration/temporary basting; Seam reinforcement; Seam sealing (water-resistant); Upholstery seams; Other
tr: Yapışkan dikiş bandı uygulaması: Kostüm/cosplay yapımı; El işi projeleri; Perde dikişleri; Giysi tamiratı; Dış mekan ekipmanları dikiş yalıtımı; Kalıp değiştirme/geçici teyel; Dikiş güçlendirme; Dikiş yalıtımı (suya dayanıklı); Döşeme dikişleri; Diğer
bg-BG: Приложение на термолепяща лента за шевове: Изработка на костюми/косплей; Крафт проекти; Шевове на завеси/драперии; Поправка на дрехи; Уплътняване на шевове на екипировка за открито; Промяна на кройки/временно тропосване; Подсилване на шев; Уплътняване на шев (водоустойчиво); Шевове на тапицерия; Друго
nb: App for smeltebånd: Kostyme-/cosplay-konstruksjon; Hobbyprosjekter; Gardinsømmer; Reparasjon av plagg; Sømforsegling for friluftsutstyr; Mønsterendring/midlertidig tråkling; Sømforsterkning; Sømforsegling (vannavstøtende); Møbelsømmer; Annet
ro-RO: Aplicare bandă termoizolantă pentru cusături: Confecționare costume/cosplay; Proiecte de artizanat; Cusături pentru perdele/draperii; Reparații de haine; Etanșarea cusăturilor la echipamente outdoor; Modificarea tiparului/însăilare temporară; Întărirea cusăturii; Etanșarea cusăturilor (rezistentă la apă); Cusături pentru tapițerie; Altele
th: การติดเทปปิดรอยต่อแบบหลอมละลาย: ทำชุดคอสตูม/คอสเพลย์; งานฝีมือ; ตะเข็บผ้าม่าน; ซ่อมแซมเสื้อผ้า; ซีลตะเข็บอุปกรณ์เอาต์ดอร์; ปรับแพตเทิร์น/เนาชั่วคราว; เสริมความแข็งแรงตะเข็บ; ซีลตะเข็บ (กันน้ำ); ตะเข็บเบาะและผ้าบุ; อื่นๆ
sv: Användningsområde för smältbar sömtejp: Kostym-/cosplaytillverkning; Pysselprojekt; Gardin-/draperisömmar; Klädreparationer; Sömtätning för friluftsutrustning; Mönsterändring/tillfällig tråckel; Sömförstärkning; Sömtätning (vattenavvisande); Möbelsömmar; Övrigt
zh-TW: 熱熔接縫膠帶用途: 戲服/Cosplay 製作; 手工藝專案; 窗簾/帷幔接縫; 衣物修補; 戶外裝備接縫密封; 版型修改/臨時疏縫; 接縫加固; 接縫密封 (防水); 傢飾布接縫; 其他
cs: Aplikace tavné švové pásky: Výroba kostýmů/cosplay; Tvořivé projekty; Švy záclon/závěsů; Opravy oděvů; Lepení švů outdoorového vybavení; Úprava střihů / dočasné stehování; Vyztužení švů; Lepení švů (voděodolné); Čalounické švy; Ostatní
el: Εφαρμογή θερμοκολλητικής ταινίας ραφών: Κατασκευή κοστουμιών/cosplay; Κατασκευές/χειροτεχνίες; Ραφές κουρτινών/υφασμάτων; Επιδιορθώσεις ενδυμάτων; Σφράγιση ραφών εξοπλισμού εξωτερικού χώρου; Τροποποίηση πατρόν/προσωρινό τρύπωμα; Ενίσχυση ραφών; Σφράγιση ραφών (αδιάβροχη); Ραφές ταπετσαρίας; Άλλο
sl-SI: Aplikacija talilnega traku za šive: Izdelava kostumov/cosplay; Rokodelski projekti; Šivi za zavese/zastiranje; Popravila oblačil; Tesnjenje šivov na opremi za zunanjo uporabo; Spreminjanje kroja/začasno fiksiranje; Ojačitev šivov; Tesnjenje šivov (vodoodporno); Šivi pri oblazinjenju; Drugo
vi: Ứng dụng băng keo đường may nhiệt: Làm trang phục/đồ cosplay; Dự án thủ công; Đường may rèm cửa/màn che; Sửa chữa quần áo; Dán kín đường may đồ dã ngoại; Sửa rập/may lược tạm thời; Gia cố đường may; Dán kín đường may (chống nước); Đường may bọc nệm; Khác
pl: Aplikacja termicznej taśmy do szwów: Tworzenie kostiumów/cosplayów; Projekty hobbystyczne; Szwy w zasłonach/kotarach; Naprawa odzieży; Uszczelnianie szwów w odzieży outdoorowej; Modyfikacja wykrojów / fastrygowanie tymczasowe; Wzmocnienie szwów; Uszczelnianie szwów (wodoodporne); Szwy tapicerskie; Inne
it: Applicazione per nastro termoadesivo: Realizzazione costumi/cosplay; Progetti di artigianato; Cuciture per tende/tendaggi; Riparazione capi di abbigliamento; Sigillatura cuciture abbigliamento outdoor; Modifica cartamodelli/imbastitura temporanea; Rinforzo cuciture; Sigillatura cuciture (resistente all’acqua); Cuciture per tappezzeria; Altro
fi: Liimautuvan saumanauhan käyttötapa: Naamiaisasujen/cosplay-asujen valmistus; Askarteluprojektit; Verhojen/draperioiden saumat; Vaatteiden korjaus; Ulkoiluvarusteiden saumojen tiivistys; Kaavojen muokkaus/väliaikainen harsinta; Sauman vahvistus; Saumojen tiivistys (vedenkestävä); Verhoilusaumat; Muu